DIAGNOSTICS -

DI-285

ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GY-03

DTC C1789/89

L4 Position Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This circuit is sending the signal to the ECU by detecting that the transfer shift lever is in "L4” position.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
¢ L4 position switch
C1789/89 L4 position switch signal does notchange. ¢ L4 position switch circuit
 Suspension control ECU
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DI-286 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check output signal of L4 position switch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthe L4 position switch condition displayed on the hand -heldtester when shifting the transfer shift
lever in ”L4” and "H4” positions.
OK:
When the transfer shift lever is shifted in ”L4” position:
”ON” is displayed for L4 position switch condition.
When the transfer shift lever is shifted in "H4” position:
”OFF” is displayed for L4 position switch condition.

ON INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
@ L4SW PREPARATION:
%@@ Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
V\’ CHECK:
O\ (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
Q// ’ (b) Measure voltage between terminal L4SW of suspension
J_ control ECU connector and body ground when transfer
= F05758 shiftleveris shiftedin”’L4” and "H4” position.
OK:
Transfer shift lever position Voltage
L4 Below 1.5V
H4 9-14V

0K> No problem.
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SKYHOOK TEMS

2 [ Check L4 position switch.

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the L4 position switch connector.

(b) Remove the L4 position switch (See page TR-9).

2 CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of L4 position
1 switch connector when the L4 position switch pushed and re-

1 @ leased.

OK:

F05759 Switch condition Resistance

Pushed 0 Q (Continuity)

Released o Q (Open)

NG> Replace L4 position switch.

@

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between L4 position
switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

Check and replace suspension control ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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